Hawaii statutes.
§667-77 Notification to mortgagor by department. Within ten days after the mortgagee's filing of a notice of
default and intention to foreclose with the department, the department shall
mail a written notification by registered or certified mail to the mortgagor
that a notice of default and intention to foreclose has been filed with the
department. The notification shall inform the mortgagor of an owner-occupant's
right to elect to participate in the foreclosure dispute resolution program and
shall include:

(1) Information about the mortgage
foreclosure dispute resolution program;

(2) A form for an owner-occupant to elect or
to waive participation in the mortgage foreclosure dispute resolution program
pursuant to this part that shall contain instructions for the completion and
return of the form to the department and the department's mailing address;

(3) A statement that the mortgagor electing
to participate in the mortgage foreclosure dispute resolution program shall
provide a certification under penalty of perjury to the department that the
mortgagor is an owner-occupant of the subject property, including a description
of acceptable supporting documentation as required by section 667-78(a)(2);

(4) A statement that the owner-occupant
shall elect to participate in the mortgage foreclosure dispute resolution
program pursuant to this part no later than thirty days after the department's
mailing of the notice or the owner-occupant shall be deemed to have waived the
option to participate in the mortgage foreclosure dispute resolution program;

(5) A description of the information
required under section 667-80(c)(2) that the owner-occupant shall provide to
the mortgagee and the neutral assigned to the dispute resolution;

(6) A statement that the owner-occupant
shall consult with an approved housing counselor or approved budget and credit
counselor at least thirty days prior to the first day of a scheduled dispute
resolution session;

(7) Contact information for all approved
housing counselors;

(8) Contact information for all approved
budget and credit counselors; and

(9) Contact information for the department.

The notification shall be mailed
to the subject property address and any other addresses for the mortgagor as
provided in the mortgagee's notice of dispute resolution under section 667-75 and the foreclosure notice under
section 667-22(a). [L 2011, c 48, pt of §1, §45(2); am L 2012, c 182, §§41, 49]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next